Illinois, session 104th, HB3795.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 155.23 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/155.23)  (from Ch. 73, par. 767.23)7    Sec. 155.23. Fraud reporting. 8        (1) Any insurer, as defined in Section 155.24 of this 9    Code, doing business in the State of Illinois that has 10    reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud which is 11    or may be a crime under Illinois law has been, is being, or 12    is about to be committed shall furnish and disclose the 13    knowledge and information to the Director or the National 14    Insurance Crime Bureau, the National Association of 15    Insurance Commissioners, or a similar organization who 16    shall disclose the information to the Director and 17    cooperate fully with any investigation conducted by the 18    Director. The Director is authorized to promulgate 19    reasonable rules requiring insurers, as defined in Section 20    155.24, doing business in the State of Illinois to report 21    factual information in their possession that is pertinent 22    to suspected fraudulent insurance claims, fraudulent 23    insurance applications, or premium fraud after he has made   HB3795- 2 -LRB104 10540 BAB 20616 b1    a determination that the information is necessary to 2    detect fraud or arson. Claim information may include: 3        (a) Dates and description of accident or loss. 4        (b) Any insurance policy relevant to the accident or 5    loss. 6        (c) Name of the insurance company claims adjustor and 7    claims adjustor supervisor processing or reviewing any 8    claim or claims made under any insurance policy relevant 9    to the accident or loss. 10        (d) Name of claimant's or insured's attorney. 11        (e) Name of claimant's or insured's physician, or any 12    person rendering or purporting to render medical 13    treatment. 14        (f) Description of alleged injuries, damage or loss. 15        (g) History of previous claims made by the claimant or 16    insured. 17        (h) Places of medical treatment. 18        (i) Policy premium payment record. 19        (j) Material relating to the investigation of the 20    accident or loss, including statements of any person, 21    proof of loss, and any other relevant evidence. 22        (k) any facts evidencing fraud or arson.23    The Director shall establish reporting requirements for 24application and premium fraud information reporting by rule.25    (2) Any person who has a reasonable belief that an act of 26insurance fraud that is or may be a crime under Illinois law   HB3795- 3 -LRB104 10540 BAB 20616 b1has been, is being, or is about to be committed or any person 2who collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning 3insurance fraud that is or may be a crime under Illinois law 4may furnish and disclose any information in the person's 5possession concerning such an act to the Director or to an 6authorized representative of an insurer that requests the 7information for the purpose of detecting, prosecuting, or 8preventing insurance fraud. The Director of Insurance may 9designate one or more data processing organizations or 10governmental agencies to assist him in gathering such 11information and making compilations thereof, and may by rule 12establish the form and procedure for gathering and compiling 13such information. The rules may name any organization or 14agency designated by the Director to provide this service, and 15may in such case provide for a fee to be paid by the reporting 16insurers directly to the designated organization or agency to 17cover any of the costs associated with providing this service. 18After determination by the Director of substantial evidence of 19false or fraudulent claims, fraudulent applications, or 20premium fraud, the information shall be forwarded by the 21Director or the Director's designee to the proper law 22enforcement agency or prosecutor. Insurers shall have access 23to, and may use, the information compiled under the provisions 24of this Section. Insurers shall release information to, and 25shall cooperate with, any law enforcement agency requesting 26such information.  HB3795- 4 -LRB104 10540 BAB 20616 b1    In the absence of malice, no insurer, or person who 2furnishes information on its behalf, is liable for damages in 3a civil action or subject to criminal prosecution for any oral 4or written statement made or any other action taken that is 5necessary to supply information required pursuant to this 6Section.7(Source: P.A. 92-233, eff. 1-1-02.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.